Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 23 Criminal Law Advisory Commission

12-23-1.
Commission created — Composition.

A commission is created to be known as the criminal law advisory commission and to consist of seven (7) members who shall be qualified electors of the state, six (6) of whom shall be appointed by the governor and the seventh member shall be the law revision director from the joint committee on legislative services, who shall be ex officio a member of the commission and its secretary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 950, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 14, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-23-1

; P.L. 1985, ch. 151, § 1.

12-23-2.
Appointment and terms of members — Vacancies.

At the January session in each odd-numbered year the governor shall, with the advice and consent of the senate, appoint two (2) members of the commission to succeed the members whose terms will next expire and to hold office until the first day of February in the sixth year after their appointment. Any vacancy which may occur in the commission when the senate is not in session shall be filled by the governor until the next session of the general assembly, when he or she shall, with the advice and consent of the senate, appoint some person to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 950, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 14, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-23-2

.

12-23-3.
Organization meeting — Chairperson.

The members of the commission shall meet for organization at the call of the secretary within two (2) weeks after each appointment by the governor, and shall at the meeting elect a chairperson who shall hold office during the pleasure of the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 950, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 14, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-23-3

.

12-23-4.
Studies and surveys.

For the purpose of improving and rendering more effective and efficient the administration of the criminal law in this state, the commission is authorized to make a complete study and survey of the subject including the detection, prosecution, and punishment of offenders, the probation, parole, and pardoning systems, and the duties, methods, and practices of the officers and agencies directly and indirectly connected with the enforcement of law, the suppression and prevention of crime and the care and treatment of the criminal, and for this purpose the commission may make any inquiry that it may deem necessary into the administration of the criminal law by the authorities of other states, the United States, and other countries.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 950, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 14, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-23-4

.

12-23-5.
Cooperation of public officers — Visitation and inspection powers.

It shall be the duty of all officers of the state and of any city or town directly or indirectly connected with the administration of the criminal law to cooperate with the commission in the study and survey authorized by this chapter, and those officers shall furnish the commission upon request all records, data, and other information at their disposal relating to matters under consideration by the commission. Members of the commission may at any time visit and inspect the institutions and places in the state where criminals are confined and may interview the officers in charge of those institutions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 950, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 14, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

12-23-5

.

12-23-6.
Advisory committees — Hearings — General powers.

The commission may appoint advisory committees of judges, lawyers, or lay persons to consider and report upon special subjects within the scope of the study and survey, and may hold hearings and compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers and generally shall have any authority and power that may be necessary to carry out the purpose of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 950, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 14, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

12-23-6

.

12-23-7.
Annual report to general assembly.

The commission shall annually make a report to the general assembly of the results of its study and survey, together with any recommendations for changes in the laws and in the duties, methods, practices, and procedure of officers and other agencies that it may deem advisable or necessary to carry out the purpose of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 950, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 14, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-23-7

.

12-23-8.
Expenses of commission — Printing.

The members of the commission shall not receive any pay for their services under the provisions of this chapter, but the general assembly shall from time to time appropriate any sums that may be necessary for clerical assistance and other actual expenses incurred by the members of the commission in the performance of their duties. All printing required by the commission, including the printing of its reports to the general assembly, shall be paid out of the appropriation for state printing upon vouchers approved by the chairperson of the commission and the state purchasing agent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 950, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 14, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

12-23-8

.